apertium-dan-nor.nno.dix
<pardef n="n/øgge__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l>oggen</l>  <r>øgge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>oggen</l> <r>øgge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ogge</l>  <r>øgge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>oggi</l>  <r>øgge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ogne</l>  <r>øgge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ogne</l>  <r>øgge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>øggande</l><r>øgge<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>øgg</l>   <r>øgge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>øgg</l><r>øgge</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>øggast</l><r>øgge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ogge</l>  <r>øgge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>oggi</l>  <r>øgge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>øgg</l>   <r>øgge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ogg</l>   <r>øgge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sk/ake__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l>jeken</l>  <r>ake<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>aka</l>   <r>ake<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>jeken</l> <r>ake<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>aka</l>   <r>ake<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>jeke</l>  <r>ake<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>jeki</l>  <r>ake<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>aka</l>   <r>ake<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>jekne</l> <r>ake<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>aka</l>   <r>ake<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>jekne</l> <r>ake<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ak</l>    <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>

<e r="LR"><p><l>aka</l>   <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ake</l>   <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ak</l><r>ake</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>akast</l> <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>aka</l>   <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>jeke</l>  <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>jeki</l>  <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>akar</l>  <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>jek</l>   <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>jeker</l> <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>aka</l>   <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ok</l>    <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>akande</l><r>ake<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="anstreng/je__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l>d</l>     <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>t</l>     <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>d</l>     <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>de</l>    <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>    <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>de</l>    <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>    <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ande</l>  <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>jande</l> <r>je<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l></l>      <r>je</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>j</l>     <r>je</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ast</l>   <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>jast</l>  <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>d</l>     <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>er</l>    <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>jer</l>   <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>de</l>    <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>    <r>je<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="mo/e__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ande</l>  <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l><r>e</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ast</l>   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ar</l>    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="lagr/e__vblex_adj" c="som mo/e men generer -e i imperativ">
<e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ande</l>  <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l></l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l></l><r>e</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ast</l>   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ar</l>    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="fuse">        <i>fus</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="lakre">       <i>lakr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="vire">        <i>vir</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="nyskipe">     <i>nyskip</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="forkorte">    <i>forkort</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="forhindre">   <i>forhindr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="forvare">     <i>forvar</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="skake">           <i>sk</i><par n="sk/ake__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="klatre">          <i>klatr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="utnytte">         <i>utnytt</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kvite">           <i>kvit</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="aure">            <i>aur</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="helge">           <i>helg</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="skildre">         <i>skildr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="lake">            <i>lak</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="hage">            <i>hag</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="angre">           <i>angr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="anstrengje">      <i>anstreng</i><par n="anstreng/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="falme">           <i>falm</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="undre">           <i>undr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="pjuske">          <i>pjusk</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="ankre"><i>ankr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="avlytte"><i>avlytt</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="befrukte"><i>befrukt</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="begeistre"><i>begeistr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="bivre"><i>bivr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="blokke"><i>blokk</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="blære"><i>blær</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="brodde"><i>brodd</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="crawle"><i>crawl</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="darre"><i>darr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="egge"><i>egg</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="fendre"><i>fendr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="flakne"><i>flakn</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="flimre"><i>flimr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="forkludre"><i>forkludr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="formolde"><i>formold</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="forsnevre"><i>forsnevr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="fryselagre"><i>fryselagr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="fuge"><i>fug</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="gneldre"><i>gneldr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="grille"><i>grill</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="harskne"><i>harskn</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="herberge"><i>herberg</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="hustre"><i>hustr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="ivre"><i>ivr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="jafse"><i>jafs</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kaskoforsikre"><i>kaskoforsikr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="klaffe"><i>klaff</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kludre"><i>kludr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="knistre"><i>knistr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kollapse"><i>kollaps</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kverne"><i>kvern</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kviskre"><i>kviskr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="livsforsikre"><i>livsforsikr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="lægre"><i>lægr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="løgste"><i>løgst</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="mjukne"><i>mjukn</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="myrde"><i>myrd</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="nupre"><i>nupr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="paffe"><i>paff</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="pjoltre"><i>pjoltr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="prunke"><i>prunk</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="pudre"><i>pudr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="rikke"><i>rikk</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="sirkle"><i>sirkl</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="sjevre"><i>sjevr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="slagge"><i>slagg</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="slentre"><i>slentr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="snultre"><i>snultr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="snåve"><i>snåv</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="sterkne"><i>sterkn</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="strutte"><i>strutt</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="svimre"><i>svimr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tele"><i>tel</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tviste"><i>tvist</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="varmhamre"><i>varmhamr</i><par n="lagr/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="vinke"><i>vink</i><par n="mo/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="overanstrengje">      <i>overanstreng</i><par n="anstreng/je__vblex_adj"/></e>
